Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 28 COUNTY IRRIGATION, DRAINAGE, AND RECLAMATION PROJECTS
§ 42-2819. Distribution of reservoir or other water through existing canal systems — Cooperation with companies and districts.

In all cases where the lands assessed for any water supply or any reservoir or reservoir capacity constructed or made available under the provisions of this chapter lie in whole or in part under any existing canal system, or are so located that the same can be irrigated through such canal system or any part or extension or enlargement thereof, the board of county commissioners of the county in which such lands, or any part thereof, are located are authorized to enter into a contract on behalf of such county, with the company, irrigation district, or individual owning or operating any such canal system under which such district, company or individual shall become the agency of the county for the distribution and delivery of such reservoir or other water to the lands of such county lying under or so located that they can be irrigated from such existing canal system, and as such agent of the county to provide for the operation and maintenance and repair of the irrigation works constructed or made available under the provisions of this chapter and authorizing such canal owners or operators to collect from the landowners under said canal system an operation and maintenance charge, toll, fee or assessment sufficient to pay the cost of such operation, maintenance and distribution including the cost of operating and maintaining the reservoir or the proportionate part thereof properly chargeable to such land, and to require the payment of such operation and maintenance charges as a condition to the delivery of such reservoir or other water supply and to withhold delivery of such reservoir or other water until all such operation and maintenance charges for past years have been paid, and when so provided in the contract between such canal owner and the county or when so ordered by the board of county commissioners, shall withhold the delivery of such water supply so provided or made available by the county under the provisions of this chapter, from any lands on which any installment of the principal, or interest of the said liens provided for in this chapter, or the amount due the sinking fund as herein provided, or any assessment levied by the county for the purpose of paying any such installment or annual interest charge or sinking fund remains delinquent, delivery to such lands, however, to be resumed upon payment of all assessments then due and payable or delinquent, but no part of the water supply provided or made available by the county under the provisions of this chapter shall be delivered to lands against which benefits have not been assessed.

§ 42-2820. Operating districts — When created — Vested with powers of irrigation districts — Board of directors.

The lands assessed for benefits of any irrigation or drainage project established under this chapter and not lying under or within the area capable of irrigation from an existing canal system with the owners of which system the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which such lands are located shall within one year after the establishment of such project by order of the board of county commissioners have made an operation and maintenance contract pursuant to the provisions of the preceding section of this chapter, shall be and become upon the expiration of said year an operating district, and such operating district shall be and is hereby vested with all the powers and authority and charged with all the duties of an irrigation district organized under the laws of the state of Idaho and shall have the power and duty to act as the agency of the county for the operation, repair and maintenance of such project, and in the case of irrigation works also for the distribution and delivery of the water made available thereby, and to enter into contracts with the board or boards of county commissioners for such purposes, and to provide for the cost of such operation, maintenance and repair of such works, and the distribution of the waters thereof by levying and collecting tolls, charges or assessments upon the lands of such operating district in like manner and with like effect as in the case of irrigation districts under the laws of this state and the board of directors of such operating district shall have all the powers and authority of a board of directors of an irrigation district and shall be elected in like manner and follow a like procedure as provided by the laws of this state relating to directors of irrigation districts, except that the first board of directors shall be appointed by the governor who shall designate in his appointments which of such directors is appointed for the one (1) year, which the two (2) year, and which the three (3) year term, said directors to be each a resident respectively of one (1) of the three (3) divisions of the district, which divisions shall also be established by the order of the governor at or prior to the time of said appointments.

§ 42-2821. Payment of interest for five years out of proceeds of sale of bonds.

The board of county commissioners, by a suitable order duly made and recorded in the office of the county recorder, may, when they deem it advisable, provide for payment of interest on such county bonds for a period of not to exceed five (5) years out of the proceeds of the sale of such bonds and in that event no assessments need be collected for the payment of such interest charges until the expiration of said period of not to exceed five (5) years, and in such event the amount of the estimates, and the liens, installments to be paid, and bonds to be issued and sold, shall be increased to a sufficient extent to provide for such funding of interest and to provide the funds required for such interest payments as well as for construction purposes and for payment of the amounts due or to become due on contracts entered into in pursuance hereof. But such order for the payment of interest for not to exceed five (5) years out of the proceeds of the sale of bonds shall be conditional upon there being available in the county treasury a sufficient amount of money from the proceeds of such bond sales to complete the construction of the proposed work, in addition to the amounts to be paid out for such interest payments and should the funds available in the county treasury for the sale of such bonds be insufficient to make such interest payments, and also complete the proposed construction and the payments of the county’s obligations on its contract or contracts in connection with such project, then, notwithstanding any such order or orders for payment of interest out of the proceeds of the sale of bonds, the county officers shall proceed to collect by taxation and the enforcement of liens as provided in this chapter, the funds necessary to make interest payments and shall use the funds derived from the sale of bonds for the purpose of completing the project and completing payment of the county’s contract obligations insofar as the proceeds of the sale of bonds may be required for such purpose.

§ 42-2822. Assessment of state lands — Separable portion of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter providing for the assessment of state lands shall be considered a separable portion of this chapter, and it is hereby declared to be the intention of the legislature that the remainder of this chapter remain in full force and effect, even if the said provisions in regard to assessment of state lands should be held unconstitutional.

§ 42-2823. Compensation of county commissioners — Employment of assistance.

The county commissioners in addition to their compensation otherwise provided by law shall be entitled to compensation for their services required under this chapter at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) per day for each and every day necessarily spent in the performance thereof, and shall be paid out of the funds provided for by this chapter and be a part of the expense as herein provided. The county commissioners shall have the power to employ such assistance and fix the rate of pay therefor in the performance of their duties under this chapter as the nature of the work may require the same to be a part of the expense herein provided for.